Mississippi statutes. Title 39. Libraries, Arts, Archives and History
Dancing Rabbit Creek Treaty Property

§ 39-5-41.
Transfer of title to property to Department of Archives and History.

The Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks is hereby authorized and empowered to transfer title to the Dancing Rabbit Creek Treaty property to the Department of Archives and History.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1973, ch. 474, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 516, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 30, 2000.).

§ 39-5-43.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2018, ch. 395, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§39-5-43. [Laws, 1973, ch. 474, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 518, § 22; Laws, 1991, ch. 410, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1991.]